Connecticut, session 2026, SB00224.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Each ballot that has been cast
at an election, primary or referendum, including any write-in ballot,
shall be exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair the ability to
conduct any recanvass or audit under chapter 147, 148, 152 or 153 of the
general statutes. As used in this section, "ballot", "election",
"referendum" and "write-in ballot" have the same meanings as provided
in section 9-1 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, "primary"
has the same meaning as provided in section 9-372 of the general
statutes and "Freedom of Information Act" has the same meaning as
provided in section 1-200 of the general statutes.
Sec. 2. Subsection (n) of section 9-1 of the general statutes is repealed
and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
LCO No. 1535 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 224
(n) "Referendum" means (1) a question or proposal which is
submitted to a vote of the electors or voters of a municipality at any
regular or special state or municipal election, as defined in this section,
(2) a question or proposal which is submitted to a vote of the electors or
voters, as the case may be, of a municipality at a meeting of such electors
or voters, which meeting is not an election, as defined in subsection (d)
of this section, and is not a town meeting, or (3) a question or proposal
which is submitted to a vote of the electors or voters, as the case may be,
of a municipality at a meeting of such electors or voters pursuant to
section 7-7 or pursuant to charter, home rule ordinance or special act;
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 9-1(n)